New York, session 2025-2026, A6520.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The agriculture and markets law is amended by adding a new 2 section 214-p to read as follows: 3 § 214-p. Labeling of foods and beverages containing harmful ingredi- 4 ents. 1. For the purposes of this article, the term "harmful ingredient" 5 shall include, but not be limited to: 6 (a) brominated vegetable oil; 7 (b) potassium bromate; 8 (c) propylparaben; 9 (d) red dye 3; 10 (e) titanium dioxide; and 11 (f) any other ingredient deemed harmful by the commissioner in consul- 12 tation with the commissioner of health. 13 2. No person, firm, corporation, partnership, association or any other 14 business association shall sell at retail or display for sale at retail 15 any food or beverage for human consumption which contains a harmful 16 ingredient unless the container of such food or beverage is clearly 17 marked with a harmful ingredient label. 18 3. The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of health, 19 shall promulgate rules and regulations regarding the content and place- 20 ment of harmful ingredient labels on required food or beverage which 21 shall include, but not be limited to, the use of plain and clear 22 language. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 24 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 25 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 26 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 27 completed on or before such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05356-01-5